Hawaii statutes.
[§435C-11] Initiation of plan. The
plan becomes operational at the direction of the insurance commissioner, upon a
finding that medical malpractice insurance is not or will not be readily
available in this State to the majority of the physicians and hospitals. Upon
a finding by the insurance commissioner that medical malpractice insurance has
become readily available in the voluntary market, the commissioner may direct
the plan to cease writing medical malpractice insurance.

The plan, being a temporary measure, shall not
remain in existence for more than three years after the plan becomes
operational. [L 1975, c 161, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next